California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The board shall in the notice, ordinance, or resolution calling an election consolidate it with the general election to be held at the same time in the respective counties in which the district is located and authorize the respective boards of supervisors to canvass the returns and certify the result of the canvass to the board. It shall be the duty of the board or boards of supervisors to so consolidate the election, canvass the returns, and cause the result thereof to be properly certified to the board of directors of the district. The election shall be held in all respects as if there were only one election, and only one ticket or ballot shall be used. When the county precinct boundaries do not coincide with the boundaries of the wards in the district, the board or boards of supervisors shall, for the purpose of the election only, reprecinct the territory in which the boundaries do not coincide, at least 30 days before the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 863.)
-------------------------------------------

11830.

Candidates for the office of director shall be voted upon at large, and every voter in the district may vote for all of the directors to be elected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11831.

Upon receipt of the returns of the canvass by the respective boards of supervisors the board shall meet and determine results of the election and declare the candidate or candidates elected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11832.

The secretary of the district shall issue certificates of election, signed by him and duly authenticated, immediately following the determination of the result of the election by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Additional Directors [11850. - 11855.]

11850.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any district formed prior to January 1, 1974, and containing a population of 1,000,000 or more on that date, the number of directors on the district board shall be increased from five to seven as provided in this article.

(b) In any district to which subdivision (a) is applicable and in any district which has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and which has a population of 250,000, or more, candidates for the office of director shall be elected by the voters of the ward each represents and shall not be voted upon at large. Nomination papers may be circulated only within the ward from which the candidate is to be elected, and shall be signed either by 1 percent of the voters within the ward or by 10 voters, whichever is the lesser number, but in no event by more than 20 voters within the ward. District circulators shall be residents of the ward in which they seek signatures and may obtain signatures only from registered voters residing within that ward.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 985, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

11851.

In any district in which the number of directors is required to be increased from five to seven as provided in Section 11850, the board of directors in office on January 1, 1974, shall, by resolution or ordinance adopted within 90 days after such date, divide the territory of the district into seven wards, and fix the boundaries thereof. The boundaries shall be fixed such that the wards are as equal in number of registered voters as may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 337.)
-------------------------------------------

11852.

The two additional directors provided for by this article shall be nominated and elected in the manner and at the election called and conducted within the district for the election of district directors pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11821) of this chapter and held at the same time as the 1974 statewide general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 337.)
-------------------------------------------

11852.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if, in a district subject to this article, by 5 p.m. on the 83rd day prior to the day fixed for the general election, no one or only one person has filed a declaration of candidacy for a particular ward, the county elections official shall submit a certificate of these facts to the district board and inform the board that it may, at a regular or special meeting held on or before the 76th day prior to the election, adopt one of the following courses of action:

(1) If only one person has filed a declaration of candidacy for a ward, appoint that person to the office.

(2) If no one has filed a declaration of candidacy for a ward, appoint a person to the office who would be qualified on the date the election would have been held.

(3) If either no one or only one person has filed a declaration of candidacy for a ward, hold the election.

(b) If the board makes an appointment pursuant to subdivision (a), the elections official shall not accept for filing any statement of write-in candidacy that is submitted after the appointment is made. The person appointed, if any, shall qualify and take office and serve exactly as if elected at an election for the office.

(c) If by the 76th day prior to the day fixed for the election, the district board has not appointed the sole candidate to the
 office pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or has not adopted a process to appoint, or appointed, a qualified person to the office pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the election shall be held.

(d) A district board may adopt a process to appoint a qualified person to the office pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). Upon adoption of this process, the district board shall appoint a qualified person to office no later than the day fixed for the election.

(e) This section shall apply to all elections held in any district subject to this article that takes place on or after January 1,
 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 108, Sec. 1.   (AB 408)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11853.

The two additional directors elected pursuant to this article shall take office immediately upon the issuance of the certificates of election by the secretary of the district. Thereafter, directors elected pursuant to the additional seats created by this article shall take office on the first day of January next following their election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 985, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

11854.

The term of office of the additional directors elected pursuant to this article shall be four years and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 337.)
-------------------------------------------

11855.

Nothing in this article shall effect the term of office of district directors in office on the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 337.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Sacramento Municipal Utility District [11857. - 11857.5.]

11857.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the Sacramento Municipal Utility District, the number of directors on the district board shall be increased from five to seven as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11857.1.

To effectuate the increase as provided in Section 11857, the board of directors in office on January 1, 1994, shall, by resolution or ordinance adopted within 90 days after that date, divide the territory of the district into seven wards, and fix the boundaries thereof. The boundaries shall be fixed so that the wards are as equal in population as may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11857.2.

The two additional directors provided for by this article shall be nominated and elected in the manner and at the election called and conducted within the district for the election of district directors pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11821) of this chapter and held at the same time as the 1994 statewide general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11857.3.

The two additional directors elected pursuant to this article shall take office immediately upon the issuance of the certificates of election by the secretary of the district. Thereafter, directors elected pursuant to the additional seats created by this article shall take office on the first day of January next following their election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11857.4.

The term of office of the additional directors elected pursuant to this article shall be four years and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11857.5.

Nothing in this article shall affect the term of office of district directors in office on the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Terms of Office of Directors [11861. - 11865.]

11861.

The directors elected at the formation election shall hold their respective offices only until the first day of January next following the next general election and until their successors are elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 985, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

11862.

Of the directors elected at the first election following the formation election, those three elected by the highest vote shall hold office for four years, and the other two for two years, and until their successors are elected and qualified. Thereafter, at each biennial general election, a number of directors corresponding to the number whose terms of office expire shall be elected for the term of four years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11863.

Directors elected at the formation election shall enter upon their official duties immediately upon the filing of the order declaring the result of the election with the Secretary of State, after qualifying according to law. The terms of directors elected after the formation election shall commence on the first day of January next following their election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 985, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

11865.

Vacancies on the board shall be filled as provided in this section:

(a) (1) The remaining board members may fill the vacancy by appointment. The person appointed to fill the vacancy shall hold office until the person elected at the next district general election that is scheduled 90 or more days after the effective date of the vacancy has been qualified and takes office. The appointment shall be made within a period of 60 days immediately subsequent to the effective date of the vacancy. A notice of the vacancy shall be posted in three or more conspicuous places in the district at least 15 days before the appointment is made.

(2) In lieu of making an appointment, the remaining members of the board may within 60 days of the vacancy call a special election to fill the vacancy. The person elected at the special election shall hold office for the remainder of the term in which the vacancy occurred.

(b) If the vacancy is not filled by appointment as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or if the board has not called for a special election within 60 days of the vacancy as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the board of supervisors of the county representing the larger portion of the district area in which the election to fill the vacancy will be held may fill the vacancy by appointment within 90 days of the effective date of the vacancy or may order the district to call a special election to fill the vacancy.

(c) If within 90 days of the effective date of the vacancy, the remaining members of the board or the appropriate board of supervisors have not filled the vacancy by appointment and no election has been called for, the district shall call a special election to fill the vacancy.

(d) A person elected at an election to fill a position to which an appointment was made pursuant to this section shall take office immediately upon issuance of the certificate of election by the secretary of the district, after qualifying according to law, and shall hold office for the remainder of the term in which the vacancy occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 242, Sec. 14.   (SB 858)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of Directors [11881. - 11895.]

11881.

The oath of office of directors shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the director has notice of his election or appointment but not later than 15 days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11882.

The board shall choose one of its members president, and another vice president, who shall be authorized to act for the president during his absence or disability, and shall provide for the time and place of holding its meetings, which shall be held at least once each month.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11883.

The board is the legislative body of the district and determines all questions of policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11884.

All matters and things necessary for the proper administration of the affairs of the district which are not provided for in this division shall be provided for by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11885.

The board shall supervise and regulate every utility owned and operated by the district, including the fixing of rates, rentals, charges, and classifications, and the making and enforcement of rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules, for or in connection with any service, product, or commodity owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

11886.

The board shall by resolution determine and create such number and character of positions as are necessary properly to carry on the functions of the district and shall establish an appropriate salary, salary range, or wage for each position so created. The board may by resolution abolish any such position. Except as otherwise provided, appointments to such positions shall be made by the general manager in accordance with the civil service provisions applicable thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11886.1.

The board of a district which has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more may delegate to the general manager the authority to take any or all of the actions provided for in Section 11886.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11887.

The board of any district having 600 or more employees may appoint not to exceed 15 employees to positions requiring peculiar and exceptional qualifications, including those of a scientific, professional, or expert character or of special confidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11887.1.

The board of a district which has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more may, notwithstanding Section 11887, determine that additional positions requiring peculiar and exceptional qualifications, including, but not limited to, those of a scientific, professional, or expert character or of special confidence, or positions with significant managerial responsibility, shall be exempt from the district civil service if the total number of these exempt positions, including the exempt positions filled pursuant to Section 11887, does not exceed 5 percent of the total civil service positions of the district. However, the board may not determine any position to be exempt as long as that position is filled by an employee appointed pursuant to
 the district civil service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11887.2.

The board of a district which has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more may, notwithstanding any other provision of this division, appoint or remove only those officers or employees who are exempt from the district civil service and who either report directly to the board or report to another officer who reports directly to the board. All other officers and employees exempt from the district civil service shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the general manager.

The board may contract for the services of any officer who reports directly to the board or who reports to an officer who reports directly to the board and may authorize the general manager to contract for the services of other officers and exempt employees. The term of these contracts may not exceed five years in duration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11888.

The board may from time to time contract for or employ any professional service required by the district or for the performance of work or services which cannot satisfactorily be performed under the civil service provisions of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11889.

The board shall employ an expert who shall examine and report, at least annually, upon the system of accounts kept by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11890.

The salaries or wages of all officers and employees of a district shall be paid periodically as the board may prescribe. At the expiration of the period fixed for the payment of salaries or wages a payroll shall be prepared, showing all persons employed during the preceding salary period and stating the amount of compensation to which each person is entitled. Payment of the salary or wages of each person specified in the payroll may be made after approval of the payroll by the board or the general manager in accordance with rules adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 985, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

11891.

The board may provide by resolution, under such terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment of demands against the district without prior specific approval thereof by the board if the demand is for a purpose for which an expenditure has been previously approved by the board and in an amount not greater than the amount so authorized, and if the demand is approved by the general manager.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11891.5.

The board of any district which has owned and operated a water distribution system for at least 10 years and which maintains a system of accounting substantially in accordance with the Uniform System of Accounts for Water Utilities prescribed by the Public Utilities Commission may provide, by resolution, under the terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment, without prior specific approval by the board, of demands against the district which relate to obligations incurred for purposes and within the amounts specified for those purposes in a projection of the district’s operations for a period of not longer than one year, if the demands are approved by the general manager. The projection shall be expressed in terms of the major groups of accounts in the uniform system of accounts and shall be incorporated in the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

11891.6.

The board of a district which has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more which maintains a system of accounting substantially in accordance with the Uniform System of Accounts for Electrical Corporations prescribed by the Public Utilities Commission, or any other generally accepted accounting system, may provide, by resolution, under the terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment, without prior specific approval by the board, of demands against the district which relate to obligations incurred for purposes and within the amounts specified for those purposes in a projection of the district’s operations for a period of not longer than one year, if the demands are approved by the general manager. The projection shall be expressed in terms of the major groups of accounts in the system of accounts and shall be incorporated in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11892.

To facilitate the business of the district, the board may provide for the creation and administration of revolving funds as the needs of the district may require. The aggregate amount of the revolving funds shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The revolving funds shall be disbursed in accordance with rules established by the board, and all payments from any revolving fund shall be reported to the board and vouchers filed therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11892.1.

Notwithstanding Section 11892, the board of a district which has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more may, to facilitate the business of the district, provide for the creation and administration of revolving funds as the needs of the district may require. The aggregate amount of the revolving funds shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). The revolving funds shall be disbursed in accordance with the rules adopted by the board, and all payments from any revolving fund shall be reported to the board and vouchers filed therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

11893.

If a legal holiday falls on a Saturday, the board may provide by resolution that the Friday preceding is a holiday within the district for the purpose of closing its offices and excusing its employees from work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 401.)
-------------------------------------------

11894.

The board may provide by resolution, if necessary to implement a memorandum of understanding adopted pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, that the Friday following the Thursday in November appointed as Thanksgiving Day is a holiday within the district for the purpose of closing its offices and excusing its employees from work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 368, Sec. 1.   Effective September 9, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

11895.

A district may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the board, change its name. A certified copy of the resolution changing the name of the district shall be recorded in each county included in whole or in part within the district and shall be transmitted to the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Meetings and Legislation [11907. - 11912.]

11907.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11908.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings and may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that each member shall receive for each attendance at the meetings of the board, or for each day’s service rendered as a director by request of the board, the sum of one hundred dollars ($100). No director shall receive any other compensation, nor receive pay for more than six days in any one calendar month. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11908.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11908, a district with a board having seven directors may provide, by resolution or ordinance, that each director shall receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at public meetings of the board or for each day’s service rendered as a director by request of the board, not exceeding a total of six days in any calendar month, or, in lieu of that compensation, a salary of not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per month subject to annual adjustments pursuant to subdivision (b), together with any expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties required or authorized by the board. No resolution or ordinance establishing compensation pursuant to this subdivision shall provide for any automatic increase in that compensation.

(b) Any district which adopts salaries for directors pursuant to subdivision (a) may increase those salaries by not more than 5 percent for each calendar year following the operative date of the last adjustment, commencing with the calendar year following adoption of the salary or increase.

(c) Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11908.2.

Notwithstanding Section 11908, the board of a district which has owned and operated an electric distribution system for at least eight years and has a population of 250,000 or more may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that each director shall receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at public meetings of the board or for each day’s service rendered as a director by request of the board, not exceeding a total of 10 days in any calendar month, together with any expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties required or authorized by the board. The board may, by resolution or ordinance, increase the compensation per day by not more than 5 percent for each calendar year following the operative date of the last adjustment, commencing with the 1988 calendar year. No resolution or ordinance establishing compensation pursuant to this subdivision shall provide for any automatic increase in that compensation. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11909.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance. No ordinance, resolution, or motion shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the affirmative votes of at least three directors of a five-ward district, or at least four directors of a seven-ward district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 692, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

11910.

(a) No ordinance shall be passed by the board within five days of the day of its introduction or at any time other than a regular or adjourned regular meeting. All ordinances or summaries of ordinances shall be published after passage.

(b) The publication of ordinances, as required by subdivision (a), may be satisfied by either of the following actions:

(1) Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment to an ordinance, the board of directors shall publish a summary of the ordinance or amendment with the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment and the secretary shall post in the office of the secretary of the board of directors a certified copy of the full text of the adopted ordinance or amendment along with the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(2) If the general manager determines that it is not feasible to prepare a fair and adequate summary of the adopted ordinance or amendment, and if the board of directors so orders, within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment to an ordinance, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page shall be published. The advertisement shall indicate the general nature of, and provide information about, the proposed or adopted ordinance or amendment, including information sufficient to enable the public to obtain copies of the complete text of the ordinance or amendment, and the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 118, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11911.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows:

“Be it enacted by the board of directors of ________ municipal utility district:”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11912.

All ordinances shall be signed by the president of the board or the vice president, and attested by the secretary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Other Officers [11926. - 11942.]

11926.

The board shall appoint and fix the salary of a general manager, who shall have full charge and control of the construction of the works of the district and of their maintenance and operation, and also of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11927.

All other things being equal, the board shall appoint as general manager some person who has had experience in municipal engineering or in the construction or management of public utilities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11928.

The general manager need not be a resident of this State at the time of his appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11929.

The general manager shall hold office for an indefinite term and may be removed by the board only upon the adoption of a resolution by the affirmative vote of not less than three members of the board of a five-ward district, or four members of the board of a seven-ward district. Before the general manager may be removed, he shall, if he demands it, be given a written statement of the reasons alleged for his removal and he shall have the right to be publicly heard thereon at a meeting of the board prior to the final vote on the resolution providing for his removal, but pending and during such hearing the board may suspend him from office. The board may not reduce the salary of the general manager below the amount fixed at the time of his original appointment except upon the adoption of a resolution by a like vote and after a like opportunity to be heard. The action of the board in suspending or removing the general manager or reducing his salary, if approved by a majority of the membership of the board, is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 337.)
-------------------------------------------

11930.

Notwithstanding this article, until such time as the district has operated, controlled, or used works or parts of works for providing the inhabitants and public agencies within the boundaries of the district with the utility services, or any of them, specified in this division, for a period of six months, the board may or may not appoint a general manager, who during such time holds office at the pleasure of the majority of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11931.

The board may appoint an accountant, a secretary, a treasurer, and an attorney, who shall hold office during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11932.

The attorney shall be admitted to practice law in the Supreme Court of the State, and shall have been actively engaged in the practice of his profession for not less than three years next preceding his appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11933.

The board may also provide for assistants to any officer of the district who shall hold office at the pleasure of the board and may perform any and all acts that their principal may perform, when authorized so to do by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11934.

The board may consolidate any of the district offices in one person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11935.

The oath of office of all appointive officers of the district shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the officer has notice of his appointment but not later than 15 days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11936.

Each appointive officer shall give such bond and in such amount as the board may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11937.

The powers of the general manager are:

(a) To see that all ordinances of the district are enforced.

(b) To administer the civil service system of the district and, except as otherwise provided in this division, to appoint to the positions created by the board which are subject to the civil service provisions of this division, such employees as are necessary for the administration of the affairs of the district, and to remove such employees, in accordance with the provisions of the civil service system.

(c) To attend all meetings of the board and submit a general report of the affairs of the district.

(d) To keep the board advised as to the needs of the district.

(e) To prepare or cause to be prepared all plans and specifications for the construction of the works of the district.

(f) To devote his entire time to the business of the district.

(g) To perform such other and additional duties as the board may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11938.

The general manager shall within 90 days from the end of each fiscal year cause to be published a summary of the financial report showing the result of operations for the preceding fiscal year and the financial status of the district on the last day thereof. The publication shall be made in the manner provided in this division for the publication of ordinances and notices generally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 79.1.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11939.

The attorney shall take charge of all suits and other legal matters to which the district is a party or in which it is legally interested. He shall give his advice or opinion in writing whenever required by the board. He shall be the legal adviser of the general manager and other district officers and shall prepare and approve the forms of all ordinances, resolutions, contracts, bonds, and other legal documents connected with the business of the district. He shall perform such other and additional services as the board may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

11940.

The accountant shall install and maintain a system of auditing and accounting which shall completely and at all times show the financial condition of the district and provide reasonable assurance that the financial transactions of the district were executed in accordance with the instructions of the board. The accountant shall prepare all instruments necessary for the payment of demands against the district in accordance with the instructions of the board. The accountant shall perform such other duties as the board may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 985, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

11941.

The treasurer shall be the custodian of the funds of the district and shall make payments and execute instruments for the payment of demands against the district after determination by the accountant that the demands are authorized. The treasurer shall keep an account of all receipts and disbursements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 985, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

11942.

With the consent of the board, the treasurer may:

(a) Authorize the trust department of any state or national bank, or a trust company authorized to act as such, to receive as his agent deposits of any securities acquired by the district.

(b) Place and maintain for safekeeping as a trust deposit with the trust department of any state or national bank, or a trust company authorized to act as such, any securities owned by the district.

The bank or trust company selected shall have a total paid-in capital of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). The treasurer shall take from the trust department or trust company a receipt for the securities, and neither the treasurer nor the district is responsible for the custody and safe return of the securities until they are withdrawn from the trust department or trust company by the treasurer. Any trust department or trust company to which securities are delivered, either as agent or depositary for the treasurer, shall make such disposition of the securities as the treasurer directs and is responsible only for strict compliance with written instructions given to it by the treasurer. All such securities are at all times subject to the order of the treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1129.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Initiative and Referendum [11950. - 11950.]

11950.

The initiative and referendum provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) of Division 9 of the Elections Code shall apply to every municipal utility district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 182.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Civil Service System [12051. - 12167.]


